Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201570-1907
C-BED project developer; provide notices.

To the extent feasible, a C-BED project developer shall provide, in writing, notice of incentives pursuant to the Rural Community-Based Energy Development Act for local ownership and local participation in a C-BED project to each property owner on whose property a turbine will be located and to the elected governing body of each municipality or political subdivision in which a turbine will be located.

Laws 2007, LB629, § 7;

Laws 2008, LB916, § 4;

Laws 2015, LB412, § 2.
August 30, 2015